Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.140

Bylaws of association—Transfer of stock, membership certificates limited.

The bylaws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock or membership certificates of the associations to persons not engaged in the production of the products handled by the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 14.]